Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202568-2207
Funding; fee schedule; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the medicaid practitioner fee schedule rates and the General Fund appropriations for rates established in the fee schedule shall not be reduced in amounts lower than the rates published as of July 1, 2024.

Laws 2025, LB527, § 7.